Florida, session 2026, HB579.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Paragraph (d) of subsection (9) of section
1002.394, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
1002.394 The Family Empowerment Scholarship Program.—
(9) PRIVATE SCHOOL ELIGIBILITY AND OBLIGATIONS.—To be
eligible to participate in the Family Empowerment Scholarship
Program, a private school may be sectarian or nonsectarian and
must:
(d) Before a student's initial enrollment, provide to the
parent, in writing, For a student determined eligible pursuant
to paragraph (3)(b), discuss the school's academic programs and
policies, specialized services, code of conduct, and attendance
policies, and specialized services and therapies offered at the
school. A private school may update the specialized services and
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb579-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 579 2026
therapies offered once per school year or if the school district
updates its list of equitable services offered, whichever comes
first. In addition, within 30 days after the school district
provides the student with a private school services plan, each
parent of a student with an individualized education plan,
education plan, English language learner plan, or 504 plan must
be informed of what modifications, accommodations, and therapies
included in the student's plan will be honored before enrollment
with the parent to determine which programs and services may
meet the student's individual needs.

If a private school fails to meet the requirements of this
subsection or s. 1002.421, the commissioner may determine that
the private school is ineligible to participate in the
scholarship program.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb579-00